Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE C. FIRE

CHAPTER 797. PORTABLE FIRE EXTINGUISHERS

Sec. 797.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "NFPA" means the National Fire Protection Association.

(2) "Portable fire extinguisher" means a device that contains liquid, powder, or gases for suppressing or extinguishing fires.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 2447), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 797.002. PORTABLE FIRE EXTINGUISHERS. A person may not use the term "portable fire extinguisher" or "fire extinguisher" in the sale or advertisement of an aerosol fire suppression device or similar fire suppression device unless the device conforms to NFPA Standard 10 (2010), "Standard for Portable Fire Extinguishers," or a successor standard adopted by the commissioner of insurance that is at least as stringent as the NFPA Standard 10, and is specifically listed for that use by a testing laboratory approved by the Texas Department of Insurance.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 2447), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.